Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3800.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1641, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Melissa Hortman Community Solar Garden Program." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end